Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6158.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "safe access to facilities act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Federal immigration authority" means a federal immigration officer. (b) "Governmental entity" means a state department or agency or a local unit of government. (c) "Judicial warrant" means a warrant issued by a court that is based on probable cause. (d) "Nonpublic area" means an area not open to the public. Sec. 3. A governmental entity shall not knowingly grant a federal immigration authority access to a nonpublic area without a judicial warrant. Sec. 4. (1) This act does not do any of the following: (a) Restrict a criminal investigation. (b) Interfere with the execution of a judicial warrant. (c) Limit cooperation in a criminal matter. (d) Restrict actions necessary to address an immediate threat to public safety. (e) Delay, restrict, or interfere with access necessary to provide emergency medical care or to protect the immediate health and safety of an individual. (f) Prohibit or restrict lawful federal enforcement actions. (2) This act governs only the conduct of state and local governmental entities and employees.